Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
ARTICLE 5
VETERANS

Cross references:

For the veterans community living centers, see article 12 of title 26.

Law reviews:

For article, "Veterans' Benefits and the Uniform Veterans Guardianship Act of

C

olorado", see 28

C

olo. Law. 53 (Feb. 1999).

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 UNIFORM VETERANS' GUARDIANSHIP LAW

PART 3 INVESTMENTS BY VETERANS ADMINISTRATION FIDUCIARIES

PART 4 LOANS TO MINOR VETERANS

PART 5 INTERMENT OF VETERANS

PART 6 COLORADO WAR VETERANS' MEMORIAL COMMISSION

PART 7 DIVISION OF VETERANS AFFAIRS

PART 8 VETERANS SERVICE OFFICE AND OFFICERS